Maryland, session 2025, SB0676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–319.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant and the hospital or related institution to
be operated shall meet the requirements of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 708 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND
INSTITUTE FOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SYSTEMS, SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING MINIMUM PERINATAL CARE STANDARDS THAT MEET
OR EXCEED THE MARYLAND PERINATAL SYSTEM STANDARDS FOR EACH HOSPITAL
THAT PROVIDES OBSTETRICAL SERVICES.
(2) EACH HOSPITAL THAT PROVIDES OBSTETRICAL SERVICES SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE PERINATAL CARE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AS A
CONDITION OF LICENSURE.
19–3B–02.
(a) A freestanding ambulatory care facility may not operate in the State unless
the Secretary has granted the facility a license.
(b) The Secretary shall issue a license to an applicant that meets the
requirements of this subtitle and all applicable regulations adopted by the Secretary.
19–3B–03.
(a) (1) After consultation with representatives of payors, health care
practitioners, and freestanding ambulatory care facilities, the Secretary shall by regulation
establish:
(ii) Standards to ensure quality of care and patient safety that shall
include:
8. The use of ultrasound imaging in a freestanding birthing
center; [and]
9. MINIMUM PERINATAL CARE STANDARDS FOR A
FREESTANDING BIRTHING CENTER THAT MEET OR EXCEED THE MARYLAND
PERINATAL SYSTEM STANDARDS THAT A FREESTANDING BIRTHING CENTER SHALL
MEET AS A CONDITION OF LICENSURE; AND
[9.] 10. Any other procedures that the Secretary considers
necessary for quality of care and patient safety.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health shall adopt the regulations required under §§ 19–319(j)(1) and 19–3B–03(a)(1)(ii)9
of the Heath – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before October 1,
2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 708
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –